District of Columbia statutes.
16-4429

Relationship to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 467; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et. seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) ) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) ).

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

History

This section is referenced in § 16-4404.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 30 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).

Editor's Notes